Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 11

Prevention of Public Offenses

12-11-101. Preventive measures.

The commission of public offenses may be prevented by proceedings:

For suppressing riots and resistance to lawful authority;

For requiring security to keep the peace or for good behavior; and

For arresting and confining insane, drunken, and disorderly persons.

City chief of police had right to arrest plaintiffs under this section where they were in fact members of an unlawful or riotous assembly. Pritchard v. Downie, 216 F. Supp. 621 (E.D. Ark. 1963), aff'd, 326 F.2d 323 (8th Cir. 1964).

History.

Crim. Code, § 9; C. & M. Dig., § 3323; Pope's Dig., § 4171; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-201.

12-11-102. Unlawful assembly of twenty or more persons.

When persons to the number of twenty (20) or more are unlawfully or riotously assembled in a city or town, the county sheriff of the county, his or her deputies, and the other peace officers and magistrates of the city or town, together with the mayor or other chief officer of the city or town, must go among the persons assembled or as near them as possible and in the name of the state command them to disperse.

If the persons assembled do not immediately disperse, the magistrates and officers must arrest them or cause them to be arrested so that they may be punished according to law, and the magistrates and officers may command to their aid all persons present or in the county.

If the persons commanded to aid the magistrates and officers neglect to do so without just cause, they shall be treated as a part of the rioters and punished accordingly.

If a magistrate or officer named in this section, having notice of an unlawful or riotous assembly, neglects to proceed to the place of assembly, or as near as he or she can with safety, and exercise the authority invested in him or her to suppress the assembly and arrest the offenders, then the magistrate or officer is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Publisher's Notes. This section, or portions thereof, may have been impliedly repealed by §5-71-206.

Cross References. Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

Misdemeanors, §5-1-107.

Plaintiffs were not falsely arrested or imprisoned where police officers were following their duty to arrest them as members of an unlawful and riotous assembly upon their failure to disperse upon command. Pritchard v. Downie, 216 F. Supp. 621 (E.D. Ark. 1963), aff'd, 326 F.2d 323 (8th Cir. 1964).

Jury instruction that if peace officers “neglected, failed or refused” to arrest members of lynch mob the jury should find the officers guilty of neglect of duty was not open to a general objection on the ground that it made the defendants liable whether they were able to make the arrests or not. Pennewell v. State, 105 Ark. 32, 150 S.W. 114 (1912).

City chief of police was peace officer with right to arrest plaintiffs under this section where they were in fact members of an unlawful or riotous assembly. Pritchard v. Downie, 216 F. Supp. 621 (E.D. Ark. 1963), aff'd, 326 F.2d 323 (8th Cir. 1964).

Cited: Chapman v. State, 257 Ark. 415, 516 S.W.2d 598 (1974).

Publisher's Notes. This section, or portions thereof, may have been impliedly repealed by §5-71-206.

Cited: Pritchard v. Downie, 216 F. Supp. 621 (E.D. Ark. 1963); Chapman v. State, 257 Ark. 415, 516 S.W.2d 598 (1974).

Amendments. The 2005 amendment deleted “male” preceding “inhabitants” in (a); and, in (c), inserted “Class A” preceding “misdemeanor.”

Cross References. Deputizing citizens by state police, §12-8-110.

Procedures of arrest, §16-81-107.

Refusing to assist officer, §5-54-109.

This section was neither void on its face nor unconstitutional as applied to defendants convicted for refusing to assist police officer in effecting a misdemeanor arrest pursuant to a warrant. Williams v. State, 253 Ark. 973, 490 S.W.2d 117 (1973).

This section is an extension of the common law concept of posse comitatus, if not merely a codification thereof. Williams v. State, 253 Ark. 973, 490 S.W.2d 117 (1973).

The standards for action for a public officer in commanding assistance in overcoming resistance to the execution of process is adequately prescribed in this section; the exercise of discretion by the officer is in keeping with the history of posse comitatus and is necessary for its effective and appropriate use, although discretion cannot be exercised arbitrarily. Williams v. State, 253 Ark. 973, 490 S.W.2d 117 (1973).

For the purposes of this section, resistance need not be by active means. Williams v. State, 253 Ark. 973, 490 S.W.2d 117 (1973).

Cited: State v. Moore, 76 Ark. 197, 88 S.W. 881 (1905); Brock v. Eubanks, 102 Ark. App. 165, 288 S.W.3d 272 (2008).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning security to keep the peace for good behavior, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 266, § 13. The section was derived from Crim. Code, §§ 371-375; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3337-3344; Pope's Dig., §§ 4185-4192; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-215 — 42-219.

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning discharge or further requirement of security, security by recognizance, security after commitment, and breaches of bond, were repealed by Acts 2011, No. 779, § 4. The sections were derived from the following sources:

12-11-106. Crim. Code, §§ 376, 378, 379; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3345-3348; Pope's Dig., §§ 4193-4196; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-220 — 42-222.

12-11-107. Crim. Code, § 382; C. & M. Dig., § 3349; Pope's Dig., § 4197; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-223.

12-11-108. Crim. Code, § 377; C. & M. Dig., § 3350; Pope's Dig., § 4198; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-224.

12-11-109. Crim. Code, §§ 380, 381; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3351, 3352; Pope's Dig., §§ 4199, 4200; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-225, 42-226.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning drunken, insane, and disorderly persons, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 423, § 8. The section was derived from Crim. Code, §§ 383-385, 387; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3353-3357; Pope's Dig., §§ 4201-4205; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-227 — 42-230; Acts 2011, No. 779, § 5.

Cross References. Law enforcement officers, immunity from civil liability, §23-60-111.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 1168, § 1, provided:

“(a)As used in this section:

“(1)‘Healthcare provider’ means an individual or facility that provides a medical-legal examination;

“(2)‘Law enforcement agency’ means a police force or organization whose primary responsibility as established by statute or ordinance is the enforcement of the criminal laws, traffic laws, or highway laws of this state;

“(3)‘Medical-legal examination’ means health care delivered to a possible victim of a sex crime, with an emphasis on the gathering and preserving of evidence for the purpose of prosecution;

“(4)‘Sex crime’ means an offense described in §5-14-101 et seq. or §5-26-202;

“(5)‘Sexual assault collection kit’ means a human biological specimen or specimens collected during a medical-legal examination from the alleged victim of a sex crime; and

“(6)‘Untested sexual assault collection kit’ means a sexual assault collection kit that has not been submitted to the State Crime Laboratory or a similar qualified laboratory for either a serology or DNA test.

“(b)(1)The State Crime Laboratory shall develop a:

“(A)Sexual assault evidence inventory audit document for a law enforcement agency; and

“(B)Sexual assault evidence inventory audit document for a healthcare provider.

“(2)(A)The sexual assault evidence inventory audit document for a law enforcement agency and the sexual assault evidence inventory audit document for a healthcare provider shall be reviewed and updated periodically.

“(B)The updated sexual assault evidence inventory audit document for a law enforcement agency and the sexual assault evidence inventory audit document for a healthcare provider may be set forth in rules promulgated by the State Crime Laboratory under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq.

“(c)Before December 31 of each year, a law enforcement agency that maintains, stores, or preserves sexual assault evidence shall conduct an audit of all untested sexual assault collection kits and any associated evidence being stored by the law enforcement agency and report the information to the State Crime Laboratory, using the sexual assault evidence inventory audit document for a law enforcement agency.

“(d)Before December 31 of each year, each healthcare provider charged with performing medical-legal examinations shall conduct an audit of all untested sexual assault collection kits being stored by the healthcare provider and report the information to the State Crime Laboratory, using the sexual assault evidence inventory audit document for a healthcare provider.

“(e)The State Crime Laboratory may communicate with a healthcare provider or a law enforcement agency for the purpose of coordinating testing and other appropriate handling of sexual assault collection kits.

“(f)Except as set forth in subsection (g) of this section, information reported to the State Crime Laboratory under this section, as well as information compiled or accumulated by a healthcare provider or law enforcement agency for the purpose of audits required by this section, is confidential and not subject to discovery under the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure or the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.

“(g)On or before each February 1, the State Crime Laboratory shall prepare and transmit to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives a report containing:

“(1)A compilation of the data submitted by law enforcement agencies and healthcare providers under this section, with the data reported in the aggregate; and

“(2)A plan to address any backlog of untested sexual assault collection kits.

“(h)This section does not remove confidentiality protection for an alleged victim of a sexual assault or other sex crime otherwise provided under Arkansas or federal laws, rules, or regulations.

“(i)A medical-legal examination continues to be subject to §12-12-402 or other applicable law.”

Cross References. Arrest and custody, §16-81-102 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1945, No. 231, § 28: Mar. 30, 1945. Emergency clause provided: “It having been ascertained and determined by the General Assembly that on account of the widespread disregard for the traffic laws of the state and the rules and regulations governing the same as a result of the establishment of many large war plants and military posts in the State of Arkansas, together with the enormous increase of traffic caused by the war, which has created conditions at and around such war plants and military posts creating a condition upon the highways of this state which, in order to efficiently operate the Department of Arkansas State Police, make it necessary that the same be departmentalized and organized in such manner that the personnel of said department can be assigned and directed in a more efficient manner and because of the hazards to life and limb as a result of the disregard for the laws making such conditions dangerous to the health, peace, and safety of the people of Arkansas an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the peace, health, and safety of the citizens of this state and for the traveling public, this act shall take effect and be in full force after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2007, No. 262, § 2: Mar. 9, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Constitution does not provide for electronic transfer of pawn records, that law enforcement agencies across the state require timely reporting of pawn records, and that this act is immediately necessary to aid pawnbrokers in providing critical information on a daily basis to law enforcement when it comes to property crimes and crimes against people. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning fingerprinting of individuals arrested for criminal offenses, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 826, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1991, No. 1015, §§ 1, 2. For current law, see §§12-12-1005(c) and12-12-1006.

Former §12-12-101, concerning the fingerprinting of individuals arrested for criminal offenses — submission to state bureau, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 1015, § 5. The former section was derived from Acts 1985, No. 1038, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 43-437.

History.

Crim. Code, §§ 366-369; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3328-3331; Pope's Dig., §§ 4176-4179; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-206 — 42-209.

12-11-103. Unlawful assembly of three or more persons.

When three (3) or more persons shall be riotously, unlawfully, or tumultuously assembled, it shall be the duty of any judge, justice of the peace, county sheriff, county coroner, or constable who shall have knowledge or be informed thereof to make a proclamation among the persons so assembled, or as near them as he or she can safely come, charging and commanding them immediately to disperse themselves and peaceably to depart to their habitations or lawful business.

If upon the proclamation being made, the persons so assembled shall not immediately disperse and depart as commanded or if they shall resist the officer or prevent the making of the proclamation, then the officer shall command those present, and the power of the county if necessary, and shall disperse the unlawful assembly, arrest the offenders, and take them before some judicial officer, to be dealt with according to law.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 44, div. 8, art. 1, §§ 2, 3; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3324, 3325; Pope's Dig., §§ 4172, 4173; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-211, 42-212.

12-11-104. Resistance to authority.

When a county sheriff or other public officer authorized to execute process finds or has reason to believe that resistance will be made to the execution of the process, the county sheriff or public officer may command as many inhabitants of his or her county as he or she may think proper, and any military companies in his or her county, armed and equipped, to assist him or her in overcoming the resistance and in arresting and confining the resisters and their aiders and abettors to be punished according to law.

The county sheriff or public officer shall report to the court from which the process issued the names of the resisters and their aiders and abettors so that they may be punished for contempt.

Every person commanded by a county sheriff or public officer to assist him or her in the execution of process, who without lawful cause refuses or neglects to obey the command, is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and contempt of the court from which the process issued.

History.

Crim. Code, §§ 362-364; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3333-3335; Pope’s Dig., §§ 4181-4183; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-202 — 42-204; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 198.

12-11-105. [Repealed.]

12-11-110. [Repealed.]

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

12-12-101. [Repealed.]

Upon receiving permission from the proper county sheriff, any law enforcement officer, acting within the official scope of his or her duty, may investigate and arrest any person violating any provision of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, §5-64-101 et seq., in any county contiguous to the county in which the county sheriff or law enforcement officer is employed.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 675, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-2625.2.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1985, No. 675, § 1, is also codified as §5-64-705.